Georgia statutes. 
(b) Errors and omissions coverage or other appropriate liability insurance in an amount which is not less than that specified by the rules and regulations of the Commissioner shall be maintained at all times by an administrator of a fund; and a certificate by the insurer or other appropriate evidence of such coverage shall be filed with the Commissioner by the fund.

(c) Each administrator shall maintain an office in this state for the payment, processing, and adjustment of the claims of the fund or funds which it represents.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-11, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-12. Revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew certificate of authority; hearing; voluntary dissolution of fund.

Statute text

(a) The Commissioner may revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew the certificate of authority of any agency when and if, after investigation, he finds that:

(1) Any certificate of authority issued to the agency was obtained by fraud;

(2) There was any material misrepresentation in the application for the certificate of authority;

(3) The agency, any fund established by the agency, the administrator of a fund, or any marketing representative has otherwise shown itself to be untrustworthy or incompetent;

(4) The agency, any fund established by the agency, the administrator of a fund, or any marketing representative has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the Commissioner promulgated pursuant to this chapter;

(5) The agency, any fund established by the agency, or the administrator of a fund has misappropriated, converted, illegally withheld, or refused to pay over upon proper demand any moneys which belong to a member or a person otherwise entitled thereto and which have been entrusted to the agency, fund, or administrator in its fiduciary capacities; or

(6) The agency or any fund established by the agency is found to be in an unsound condition or in such condition as to render its future transaction of business in this state hazardous to its members.

(b) Before the Commissioner shall revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew the certificate of authority of any agency, he shall give the agency an opportunity to be fully heard and to introduce evidence in its behalf. In lieu of revoking, suspending, or refusing to issue or renew the certificate of authority of any agency for any of the causes enumerated in this Code section, after hearing as provided in this Code section, the Commissioner may place the fund and its administrator on probation for a period of time not to exceed one year when, in his judgment, he finds that the public interest and the interests of the fund's members would not be harmed by the continued operation of the fund. At any hearing provided for by this Code section, the Commissioner or his designee shall have authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Any witness testifying falsely after taking an oath commits the offense of perjury.

(c) No fund shall be voluntarily dissolved or otherwise voluntarily cease to function unless:

(1) Written approval is first obtained from the Commissioner; and

(2) The Commissioner determines that all claims and other legal obligations of the fund have been paid or that adequate provisions for such payment have been made.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-12, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-13. Exemption from state and local taxes and fees.

Statute text

Interlocal risk management agencies and funds established by such agencies shall be exempt from state and local taxes and fees.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-13, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-14. Periodic examinations.

Statute text

The Commissioner shall have the authority to require and conduct periodic examinations to verify the solvency of funds in the same manner and under the same conditions as insurers are examined under Chapter 2 of Title 33.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-14, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-15. Fund deficiencies; assessments upon members; liquidation of fund.

Statute text

(a) If the assets of a fund are at any time insufficient to enable a fund to discharge its legal liabilities and other obligations and to maintain the reserves and surplus required of it under this chapter, the agency shall forthwith make up the deficiency or levy an assessment upon the members of the fund for the amount needed to make up the deficiency.

(b) If the agency fails to make up the deficiency or to make the required assessment of the fund members within 30 days after the Commissioner orders it to do so or if the deficiency is not fully made up within 60 days after the date on which any such assessment is made or within such longer period of time as may be specified by the Commissioner, the fund shall be deemed to be insolvent and shall be proceeded against in the same manner as are domestic insurers under Chapter 37 of Title 33; and the Commissioner shall have the same powers and limitations in such proceedings as are provided under that chapter, except as otherwise provided for in this chapter.

(c) If the liquidation of a fund is ordered, an assessment shall be levied upon its members for such an amount as the Commissioner determines to be necessary to discharge all liabilities of the fund, including the reasonable costs of liquidation.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-16. Rules and regulations.

Statute text

The Commissioner shall have authority to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-16, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-17. Hearings.

Statute text

Any party which is aggrieved by any act, determination, order, or any other action of the Commissioner taken pursuant to this chapter may request a hearing before the Commissioner or otherwise proceed in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-17, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-18. Excess loss funding program required.

Statute text

(a) An interlocal risk management agency shall maintain at all times an excess loss funding program acceptable to the Commissioner. An excess loss funding program may consist of excess insurance, self-funding from unobligated surplus of a fund, any combination of the foregoing, or any other funding program acceptable to the Commissioner.

(b) The excess loss funding program of an agency shall be approved by the Commissioner as a condition to the issuance and maintenance of a certificate of authority of any agency which establishes a fund or funds authorized pursuant to this article. An agency may be permitted to purchase excess insurance:

(1) From insurers authorized to transact business in this state; or

(2) From approved surplus lines carriers.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-18, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1454, § 4.)

36-85-19. Audits of funds.

Statute text

Each fund established under this chapter shall have an annual audit of its books and accounts performed by a certified public accountant. Such audit shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A copy of such audit shall be made available to fund members.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-19, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-20. Exercise of authority not provision of liability insurance; sovereign immunity.

Statute text

The exercise by a municipality or county of the authority provided in this chapter shall not constitute the provision of liability insurance protection under Article I, Section II, Paragraph IX of the Constitution of the State of Georgia. The participation by a municipality or county as a member of an agency authorized by this chapter shall not constitute the obtaining of liability insurance and no sovereign immunity shall be waived on account of such participation.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1454, § 5.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Tort Liability: The Summer of '92," see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 405 (1993).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - O.C.G.A. § 36-85-20 conflicts with Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. IX, as the statute read prior to the 1990 amendment, and was therefore void. Hiers v. City of Barwick, 262 Ga. 129, 414 S.E.2d 647 (1992).

County's participation in an interlocal risk management plan did not constitute liability insurance for the purpose of waiving the county's sovereign immunity to the extent of the plan's coverage. Gilbert v. Richardson, 264 Ga. 744, 452 S.E.2d 476 (1994).

Even though the 1991 amendment of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. IX, eliminated the language under which O.C.G.A. § 36-85-20 was found unconstitutionally void, the revision did not resurrect the statute and, accordingly, the statute did not provide a basis for finding a county's participation in an interlocal risk management plan constituted a waiver of sovereign immunity. The county's purchase of such insurance agreement constituted the purchase of insurance under O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b) and the county waived the county's sovereign immunity to the extent of such coverage; reversing in part, Gilbert v. Richardson, 211 Ga. App. 795, 440 S.E.2d 684 (1994). Gilbert v. Richardson, 264 Ga. 744, 452 S.E.2d 476 (1994).

GIRMA allows waiver of sovereign immunity to extent of coverage. - Trial court erred in granting summary judgment to city and the officer involved in a car accident, based on the doctrine of sovereign immunity, since it has been held that the constitutional provision providing waiver of immunity to the extent of insurance applies to municipalities, that the nonwaiver of immunity provision of O.C.G.A. § 36-85-20 is unconstitutional, and that municipal coverage under a Georgia Interlocal Risk Management Agency (GIRMA) policy results in waiver of immunity to the extent of that coverage. Harden v. Burdette, 204 Ga. App. 733, 420 S.E.2d 626 (1992).

Cited in Sinkfield v. Pike, 201 Ga. App. 652, 411 S.E.2d 889 (1991).

——————————

CHAPTER 86

LOCAL GOVERNMENT EFFICIENCY

Sec.

36-86-1. Short title.

36-86-2. Legislative findings and determinations; purpose.

36-86-3. Definitions.

36-86-4. Local Government Efficiency Grant Program established; grant categories; rules and regulations; budget process; efficiency assessments.

Annotations

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Local Government Efficiency Grant Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Community Affairs, Chapter 110-5.

Law reviews. - For note on 1993 enactment of this chapter, see 10 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 160 (1993).

36-86-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Government Efficiency Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-86-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1574, § 1.)

36-86-2. Legislative findings and determinations; purpose.

Statute text

(a) The General Assembly finds and determines that there is a pressing need for modernization and reorganization of local government service delivery programs in many parts of the state. Both increasing population and urbanization in some areas of the state, as well as relative population decreases in other areas of the state, together with modern developments in transportation, communication, information, and other service delivery equipment and systems have rendered obsolete many of the traditional local government territorial systems for delivery of local government services.

(b) In many cases the consolidation of local government units or the consolidation of local government service delivery programs can lead to increased efficiency in the delivery of local government services, thereby providing either enhanced service delivery, lower levels of taxation, or both. In other cases, however, existing territorial systems for local government service delivery already operate in an efficient and cost-effective manner.

(c) The purpose of this chapter is to provide incentives and requirements relating to consolidation of local government units and local government service delivery programs in those cases where such consolidation will improve efficiency and cost effectiveness, without disturbing territorial arrangements which already operate in an efficient and cost-effective manner.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-86-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1574, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, subsection designations were added to this Code section.

36-86-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Local government unit" includes each county in the state, each municipality in the state, each consolidated government in the state, and each local authority in the state which operates any local government service delivery program but does not include local school systems.

(2) "Service" or "local government service" includes any and all services provided by a local government unit, including but not limited to the following:

(A) Law enforcement;

(B) Fire protection and fire safety;

(C) Road and street construction and maintenance;

(D) Public transportation;

(E) Water supply and distribution;

(F) Waste-water, sewage, and storm-water collection and disposal;

(G) Public housing;

(H) Public health services;

(I) Enforcement of building, housing, plumbing, and electrical codes and other similar codes;

(J) Parks and recreation systems;

(K) Planning and zoning;

(L) Solid waste management; and

(M) Electric or gas utility services.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-86-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1574, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 467, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, "similar" was substituted for "similiar" in subparagraph (2)(I).

36-86-4. Local Government Efficiency Grant Program established; grant categories; rules and regulations; budget process; efficiency assessments.

Statute text

(a) There is established within the Department of Community Affairs a local government efficiency grant program. Funds may be appropriated to such grant program by line item reference in any appropriations Act, and any funds so appropriated shall be used for the sole purpose of making grants to local governments for the following purposes:

(1) Conducting efficiency assessments to determine the need for and desirability of consolidation of local government units or local government service delivery programs, including privatization of such programs, or both;

(2) Planning for the consolidation of local government units or local government service delivery programs, including privatization of such programs, or both, when it has been determined that such consolidation is needed and desirable; and

(3) Implementing the consolidation of local government units or local government service delivery programs, including privatization of such programs, or both, where it has been determined that such consolidation is needed and desirable and a plan has been developed for carrying out the consolidation or furthering the efficiency and effectiveness of a single consolidated local government's service delivery programs.

(b) The Department of Community Affairs shall promulgate rules and regulations which shall provide for:

(1) Standards and procedures for local governments to make application for local government efficiency grant funds; and

(2) Standards and procedures for the awarding of local government efficiency grant funds, such standards to be consistent with the statement of legislative findings set out in Code Section 36-86-2.

(c) Funds appropriated for local government efficiency grants shall be subject to normal budgetary processes and controls, including the lapsing of unexpended and uncommitted funds at the end of each fiscal year.

(d) The Department of Community Affairs shall provide procedures and guidelines specifying the manner of conducting and the contents of the efficiency assessments that are authorized to be conducted under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

(e) The efficiency assessments shall be conducted only for the purpose of providing the local government units with the cost savings and efficiencies, if any, which could be achieved through consolidation of governmental units or service delivery programs or both. There shall be no requirement that local government units that elect to conduct an efficiency assessment be compelled to consolidate local government units or local government service delivery programs as a result of the findings of the efficiency assessment.

(f) No local government shall be required to undertake any of the studies necessary for carrying out the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section unless funds are appropriated for the purposes of that subsection.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-86-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1574, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 36; Ga. L. 1995, p. 467, § 1.)

Annotations

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Local Government Efficiency Grant Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Community Affairs, Chapter 110-5-1.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Privatization of governmental services by state or local governmental agency, 65 A.L.R.5th 1.

——————————

CHAPTER 87

PARTICIPATION IN FEDERAL PROGRAMS

Sec.

36-87-1. Legislative findings.

36-87-2. Authority of counties and municipal corporations to participate in programs; powers.

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, this chapter, which was enacted as Chapter 86, containing Code Sections 36-86-1 and 36-86-2, was redesignated as Chapter 87, containing Code Sections 36-87-1 and 36-87-2.

36-87-1. Legislative findings.

Statute text

Pursuant to Article III, Section VI, Paragraph II, subparagraph (a)(3) of the Constitution of Georgia, the General Assembly finds it to be in the public interest of the citizens of Georgia and a public purpose for counties and municipal corporations to be authorized to participate in certain federal programs.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-87-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 792, § 1.)

36-87-2. Authority of counties and municipal corporations to participate in programs; powers.

Statute text

(a) Each county and municipal corporation of the State of Georgia is authorized to participate in federal programs which provide federal grants and federal loans for such purposes including but not limited to housing, transportation, and water and waste-water treatment and distribution purposes. Supplementary to any existing authority granted by law, counties and municipal corporations shall be authorized to exercise the following powers:

(1) To expend revenues, but shall not impose any new form of taxation; and

(2) To contract:

(A) With the United States and its departments and agencies;

(B) With the State of Georgia and its departments, agencies, and authorities;

(C) With regional commissions, political subdivisions of the state, and public authorities of such subdivisions; and

(D) With private nonprofit entities organized for the purpose of providing services to persons of low and moderate income when such entities are exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986

when the exercise of such powers is necessary to comply with the conditions established by federal law and federal regulations for eligibility for participation in such federal programs.

(b) (1) Supplementary to any existing authority granted by law, counties and municipal corporations shall be authorized to expend public funds and participate in community development block grant programs and other federal programs to construct facilities to carry out the following purposes:

(A) Providing day-care services primarily to the children of persons of low and moderate income;

(B) Providing services to elderly persons;

(C) Providing health education, literacy and English language instruction, mental health and disability services, legal assistance, emergency food, and medical assistance to low and moderate income persons; and

(D) Any combination of services authorized in this paragraph.

(2) Counties and municipalities are further authorized to carry out the purposes of this subsection by contracting with public agencies and nonprofit entities described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

(3) Any contracts, programs, projects, or expenditures of public funds authorized by this subsection which were entered into, carried out, undertaken, or made prior to April 5, 1994, are validated and confirmed.

(c) State agencies rating applications from counties and municipal corporations for federal funding of the construction of child care learning centers shall, to the extent allowed under applicable federal laws or regulations, give priority to those child care learning centers located in or adjacent to industrial parks.

(d) Supplementary to any existing authority granted by law, counties and municipal corporations shall be authorized to:

(1) Participate in federal and state programs which provide funds for job training, job research assistance, and workforce development programs;

(2) Accept and expend grant funds subject to such terms as may be required by the grantor, including the duty to reimburse the grantor for any funds not expended in accordance with such terms;

(3) Contract with public agencies and nonprofit entities described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section for the purpose of carrying out such programs; and

(4) Ratify any contracts, programs, projects, or expenditures of public funds authorized by this subsection which were entered into, carried out, undertaken, or made prior to July 1, 1997.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-87-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 792, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 822, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 13; Ga. L. 1997, p. 696, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1484, § 1/HB 186; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 36/SB 465; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 21/HB 1216; Ga. L. 2013, p. 135, § 9/HB 354.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, "April 5, 1994," was substituted for "the effective date of this subsection" in paragraph (b)(3), and "July 1, 1997" was substituted for "the effective date of this subsection" in paragraph (d)(4).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, "commissions" was substituted for "commission" in subparagraph (a)(2)(C).

——————————

CHAPTER 88

ENTERPRISE ZONES

Sec.

36-88-1. Short title.

36-88-2. Legislative findings and intent; construction.

36-88-3. Definitions.

36-88-4. Available incentives; qualifying business; exemptions.

36-88-5. Designation of enterprise zones.

36-88-6. Criteria for enterprise zone.

36-88-7. Local ordinances' effect on enterprise zone.

36-88-8. Tax exemption.

36-88-9. Other tax incentives; reporting.

36-88-10. Time limitations.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article commenting on the enactment of this chapter, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 191 (1997).

36-88-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Enterprise Zone Employment Act of 1997."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1.)

36-88-2. Legislative findings and intent; construction.

Statute text

The General Assembly finds and determines that there is a need for revitalization in many areas of Georgia. Revitalization will improve geographic areas within cities and counties which are suffering from disinvestment, underdevelopment, and economic decline and will encourage private businesses to reinvest and rehabilitate such areas. The General Assembly recognizes that increased employment opportunities for the citizens of Georgia will assist in the implementation of welfare reform. It is the intent of the General Assembly that this chapter be liberally construed to accomplish these purposes.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1.)

36-88-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Ad valorem tax" means property taxes levied for state, county, or municipal operating purposes but does not include property taxes imposed by school districts or property taxes imposed for general obligation debt.

(2) "Business enterprise" means any business engaged primarily in retail, manufacturing, warehousing and distribution, processing, telecommunications, tourism, research and development industries, new residential construction, and residential rehabilitation.

(3) "Department" means the Department of Community Affairs.

(4) "Enterprise zone" means the geographic area designated pursuant to Code Section 36-88-5.

(5) "Full-time job equivalent" means a job or jobs with no predetermined end date, with a regular work week of 30 hours or more, and with the same benefits provided to similar employees.

(6) "Low-income and moderate-income individual" means a person currently:

(A) Unemployed or unemployed for three of the six months prior to the date of hire;

(B) Homeless;

(C) A resident of public housing;

(D) Receiving temporary assistance for needy families or who has received temporary assistance for needy families at any time during the 18 months previous to the date of hire;

(E) A participant in the Workforce Investment Act or who has participated in the Workforce Investment Act at any time during the 18 months previous to the date of hire;

(F) A participant in a job opportunity where basic skills are required or who has participated in such a job opportunity at any time during the 18 months previous to the date of hire;

(G) Receiving supplemental social security income; or

(H) Receiving food stamps.

(7) "New job" means employment for an individual created within an enterprise zone by a new or expanded qualified business or service enterprise at the time of the initial staffing of such new or expanded enterprise.

(8) "Qualified or qualifying business" means an employer that meets the requirements of Code Section 36-88-4 and other applicable requirements of this chapter.

(8.1) "Sales and use tax" means sales and use taxes applicable to sales transactions within the boundaries of an area designated as an enterprise zone pursuant to subsection (g) of Code Section 36-88-6, not to include:

(A) A sales and use tax for educational purposes exempted from such limitation under Article VIII, Section VI, Paragraph IV of the Constitution;

(B) Any tax levied for purposes of a metropolitan area system of public transportation, as authorized by the amendment to the Constitution set out at Georgia Laws, 1964, page 1008; the continuation of such amendment under Article XI, Section I, Paragraph IV(d) of the Constitution; and the laws enacted pursuant to such constitutional amendment; or

(C) Any tax levied for purposes of water and sewer projects pursuant to Article 4 or 5A of Chapter 8 of Title 48.

(9) "Service enterprise" means an entity engaged primarily in finance, insurance, and real estate activity or activities listed under the Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) Codes 60 through 67 according to the Federal Office of Management and Budget Standard Industrial Classification Manual, 1987 edition, or engaged primarily in day-care activities.

(10) "Urban redevelopment plan" means a plan prepared and adopted pursuant to the requirements of Chapter 61 of this title.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 36; Ga. L. 1999, p. 333, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 818, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 939, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2017, p. 52, § 1/HB 342.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, added paragraph (8.1).

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, "Office" was substituted for "office" in paragraph (9).

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2004, p. 939, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by that Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004.

Law reviews. - For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 186 (2003).

36-88-4. Available incentives; qualifying business; exemptions.

Statute text

(a) The following incentives are available to qualifying business and service enterprises to encourage revitalization within enterprise zones:

(1) The enterprise zone property tax exemption provided in Code Section 36-88-8;

(2) The occupational tax, regulatory fee, and business inspection fee abatement or reduction provided in Code Section 36-88-9; and

(3) For enterprise zones created pursuant to subsection (g) of Code Section 36-88-6, the sales and use tax exemption provided in such subsection pursuant to the authority granted by Article IX, Section II, Paragraph VII(c) of the Constitution of Georgia.

(b) A qualifying business or service enterprise is an enterprise which increased employment by five or more new full-time job equivalents in an area designated as an enterprise zone and which provides additional economic stimulus in such zone. The quality and quantity of such additional economic stimulus shall be determined, on a case-by-case basis, by the local governing body or bodies that have designated the enterprise zone. Such business or service enterprise may be new, an expansion or reinvestment of an existing business or service enterprise, or a successor to such business or service enterprise. Whenever possible, 10 percent of such new employees shall be low-income or moderate-income individuals.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this Code section to the contrary, a local governing body or bodies creating an enterprise zone prior to January 1, 2000, may provide the exemptions and abatements as provided in this chapter to any qualifying business or service enterprise which employs at least 5,000 persons and which creates ten or more new full-time job equivalents that did not exist prior to July 1, 1997, provided such qualifying business or service enterprise provides economic stimulus to such zone and the quality and quantity of such stimulus is acceptable to the local governing body or bodies creating the enterprise zone.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 52, § 2/HB 342.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, deleted "and" from the end of paragraph (a)(1); substituted "; and" for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(2); and added paragraph (a)(3).

36-88-5. Designation of enterprise zones.

Statute text

A local governing body or bodies may designate one or more geographic areas as enterprise zones. In such enterprise zone, local ad valorem taxes, occupation taxes, license fees, and other local fees and taxes, except local sales and use taxes or any combination thereof, may be exempted or reduced from applying to qualified business and service enterprises in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. A joint resolution by a county and one or more municipalities may provide such exemptions for jointly designated enterprise zones. Any areas designated as an enterprise zone may be redesignated as an enterprise zone after the expiration of its initial term as an enterprise zone if the area continues to meet the criteria for an enterprise zone contained in this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1.)

36-88-6. Criteria for enterprise zone.

Statute text

(a) In order to be designated as an enterprise zone, a nominated area shall meet at least three of the five criteria specified in subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f), or the criteria specified in subsection (g) of this Code section. In determining whether an area suffers from poverty, unemployment, or general distress, the governing body shall use data from the most current United States decennial census and from other information published by the United States Bureau of the Census, the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics, and the Georgia Department of Labor. In determining whether an area suffers from underdevelopment, the governing body shall use the data specified in subsection (e) of this Code section. The data shall be comparable in point or period of time and methodology employed.

(b) Pervasive poverty shall be evidenced by showing that poverty is widespread throughout the nominated area and shall be established by using the following criteria:

(1) The poverty rate shall be determined from the data in the most current United States decennial census prepared by the United States Bureau of the Census;

(2) For parcels within the nominated area, the parcels must be within or adjacent to a census block group where the ratio of income to poverty level for at least 15 percent of the residents shall be less than 1.0;

(3) Census geographic block groups with no population shall be treated as having a poverty rate which meets the standards of paragraph (2) of this subsection; and

(4) All parcels of a nominated area must abut and may not contain a noncontiguous parcel, unless such nonabutting parcel qualifies separately under the criteria set forth under paragraph (2) of this subsection.

(c) Unemployment shall be evidenced by the use of data published by the Office of Labor Information Systems of the Georgia Department of Labor indicating that the average rate of unemployment for the nominated area for the preceding calendar year is at least 10 percent higher than the state average rate of unemployment or by evidence of adverse economic conditions brought about by significant job dislocation within the nominated area such as the closing of a manufacturing plant or federal facility.

(d) General distress shall be evidenced by adverse conditions within the nominated area other than those of pervasive poverty and unemployment. Examples of such adverse conditions include, but are not limited to, a high incidence of crime, abandoned or dilapidated structures, deteriorated infrastructure, and substantial population decline.

(e) Underdevelopment shall be evidenced by data indicating development activities, or lack thereof, through land disturbance permits, business license fees, building permits, development fees, or other similar data indicating that the level of development in the nominated area is lower than development activity within the local governing body's jurisdiction.

(f) General blight within the nominated area shall be evidenced by the inclusion of any portion of the nominated area in an urban redevelopment area as defined by paragraph (20) of Code Section 36-61-2 for which an urban redevelopment plan has been adopted by the affected governing bodies according to the requirements of Chapter 61 of this title.

(g) (1) A nominated area under this subsection shall:

(A) Be included in an urban redevelopment area as defined by paragraph (23) of Code Section 36-61-2; and

(B) Contain within its borders the site for a redevelopment project having a minimum of $400 million in capital investment for the redevelopment of an area certified by the commissioner to have been chronically underdeveloped for a period of 20 years or more.

(2) Any nominated area meeting the criteria in paragraph (1) of this subsection may be designated as an enterprise zone. Any redevelopment project used to qualify an area for designation as an enterprise zone under this subsection shall, upon approval of such designation, qualify for an exemption of any sales and use tax levied within the boundaries of such project.

(3) Any variation in the sales price of goods and services within any redevelopment project used to qualify an area for designation as an enterprise zone under this subsection attributable to lease arrangements between a retailer and the owner of the project shall be a permitted practice under Parts 1 and 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10.

(4) By resolution or ordinance, the local governing body designating and creating an enterprise zone under this subsection may assess and collect annual enterprise zone infrastructure fees from each retailer operating within the boundaries of the project in an amount not to exceed, in aggregate, the amount of sales and use tax on transactions of such retailer exempted under paragraph (2) of this subsection, which fees may be pledged by such local governing body, directly or indirectly, as security for revenue bonds issued for development or infrastructure within the enterprise zone.

(5) This subsection shall not apply to projects involving or related to casino gambling.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 36; Ga. L. 2004, p. 939, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 132, § 1/HB 427; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942; Ga. L. 2017, p. 52, § 3/HB 342.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, inserted ", or the criteria specified in subsection (g)" near the end of the first sentence of subsection (a); and added subsection (g).

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2004, p. 939, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by that Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004.

36-88-7. Local ordinances' effect on enterprise zone.

Statute text

(a) (1) Each ordinance adopted by a local government possessing an approved enterprise zone, when applicable, shall provide encouragement and incentives to increase rehabilitation, renovation, restoration, improvement for new construction for housing and the economic viability and profitability of businesses and commerce located within such enterprise zones.

(2) Creation of an enterprise zone shall be consistent with the comprehensive plan or plans of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions designating the enterprise zone which plan or plans are adopted pursuant to Chapter 70 of this title.

(3) Each local government possessing an enterprise zone may review its ordinances to determine which ordinances may have a negative effect upon the rehabilitation, renovation, restoration, improvement, or new construction of housing, or the economic viability and profitability of businesses and commerce located within an enterprise zone. Such local government may waive, amend, or otherwise modify such ordinances so as to minimize such adverse effect.

(b) Nothing in this Code section shall authorize any local government to waive, amend, provide exceptions to or otherwise modify or alter any ordinance which is:

(1) Expressly required to implement or enforce any statutory provisions; or

(2) Designed to protect persons against discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, national origin, sex, age, or handicap.

(c) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to rescind the authority granted to local governments to create, maintain, and regulate enterprise zones pursuant to any local enterprise zone law in effect on July 1, 1997.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1.)

36-88-8. Tax exemption.

Statute text

(a) (1) The governing body of a local government or governments creating an enterprise zone other than an enterprise zone under subsection (g) of Code Section 36-88-6, shall include in the creating ordinance a provision to exempt qualifying business and service enterprises from state, county, and municipal ad valorem taxes that would otherwise be levied on the qualifying business and service enterprises not to exceed the following schedule:

(A) One hundred percent of the property taxes shall be exempt for the first five years;

(B) Eighty percent of the property taxes shall be exempt for the next two years;

(C) Sixty percent of the property taxes shall be exempt for the next year;
